Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202529-4808
Veteran justice program; veteran sentencing considerations; training; reports; applicability of provisions.

Sections 29-4801 to 29-4807 apply on and after July 1, 2027.

Laws 2025, LB150, § 40.